test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_styeredem_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - styeredem:
    styeredem+N+Sg+Nom: styeˊredem
    styeredem+N+Sg+Gen: styeˊredem
    styeredem+N+Sg+Acc: styeˊredem
    styeredem+N+Sg+Ill: styereedmân
    styeredem+N+Sg+Loc: styereedmist
    styeredem+N+Sg+Com: styereedmáin
    styeredem+N+Sg+Abe: styeˊredemttáá
    styeredem+N+Ess: styereedmin
    styeredem+N+Par: styereedmid
    styeredem+N+Pl+Nom: styereedmeh
    styeredem+N+Pl+Gen: styereedmij
    styeredem+N+Pl+Acc: styereedmijd
    styeredem+N+Pl+Ill: styereedmáid
    styeredem+N+Pl+Loc: styereedmijn
    styeredem+N+Pl+Com: styereedmijguin
    styeredem+N+Pl+Abe: styereedmijttáá

  Noun - lasanem:
    lasanem+N+Sg+Nom: laṣanem
    lasanem+N+Sg+Gen: laṣanem
    lasanem+N+Sg+Acc: laṣanem
    lasanem+N+Sg+Ill: lassaanmân
    lasanem+N+Sg+Loc: lassaanmist
    lasanem+N+Sg+Com: lassaanmáin
    lasanem+N+Sg+Abe: laṣanemttáá
    lasanem+N+Ess: lassaanmin
    lasanem+N+Par: lassaanmid
    lasanem+N+Pl+Nom: lassaanmeh
    lasanem+N+Pl+Gen: lassaanmij
    lasanem+N+Pl+Acc: lasaanmijd
    lasanem+N+Pl+Ill: lassaanmáid
    lasanem+N+Pl+Loc: lassaanmijn
    lasanem+N+Pl+Com: lassaanmijguin
    lasanem+N+Pl+Abe: lassaanmijttáá

  Noun - kiškodem:
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Nom: kiˊškodem
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Gen: kiˊškodem
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Acc: kiˊškodem
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Ill: kiškoodmân
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Loc: kiškoodmist
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Com: kiškoodmáin
    kiškodem+N+Sg+Abe: kiˊškodemttáá
    kiškodem+N+Ess: kiškoodmin
    kiškodem+N+Par: kiškoodmid
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Nom: kiškoodmeh
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Gen: kiškoodmij
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Acc: kiškoodmijd
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Ill: kiškoodmáid
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Loc: kiškoodmijn
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Com: kiškoodmijguin
    kiškodem+N+Pl+Abe: kiškoodmijttáá

  Noun - pargeldem:
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Nom: paˊrgeldem
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Gen: paˊrgeldem
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Acc: paˊrgeldem
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Ill: pargeeldmân
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Loc: pargeeldmist
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Com: pargeeldmáin
    pargeldem+N+Sg+Abe: paˊrgeldemttáá
    pargeldem+N+Ess: pargeeldmin
    pargeldem+N+Par: pargeeldmid
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Nom: pargeeldmeh
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Gen: pargeeldmij
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Acc: pargeeldmijd
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Ill: pargeeldmáid
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Loc: pargeeldmijn
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Com: pargeeldmijguin
    pargeldem+N+Pl+Abe: pargeeldmijttáá

  Noun - komerdem:
    komerdem+N+Sg+Nom: koˊmerdem
    komerdem+N+Sg+Gen: koˊmerdem
    komerdem+N+Sg+Acc: koˊmerdem
    komerdem+N+Sg+Ill: koomeerdmân
    komerdem+N+Sg+Loc: koomeerdmist
    komerdem+N+Sg+Com: koomeerdmáin
    komerdem+N+Sg+Abe: koˊmerdemttáá
    komerdem+N+Ess: koomeerdmin
    komerdem+N+Par: koomeerdmid
    komerdem+N+Pl+Nom: koomeerdmeh
    komerdem+N+Pl+Gen: koomeerdmij
    komerdem+N+Pl+Acc: koomeerdmijd
    komerdem+N+Pl+Ill: koomeerdmáid
    komerdem+N+Pl+Loc: koomeerdmijn
    komerdem+N+Pl+Com: koomeerdmijguin
    komerdem+N+Pl+Abe: koomeerdmijttáá
